Arkansas, session 2025, HB1901.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 21, Chapter 6, Subchapter 3, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
21-6-312. Passport fees collected by county office.
(a) A county office that is a passport acceptance facility recognized
by the United States Department of State shall collect:
(1) The application and execution or acceptance fees for
processing passport applications; and
(2) Reasonable fees for passport photographs, mail services, and
expediting an application in accordance with and as permitted by federal law
or regulation as existing on January 1, 2025.
(b)(1) The fees collected under subsection (a) of this section that
are not directly remitted to the United States Department of State or the
United States Postal Service shall be paid into the county treasury to the
credit of the fund to be known as the "passport acceptance facility fund".
(2) Moneys deposited into the fund shall be appropriated by the
county quorum court and expended for the operation of the county office that
*SSS265*
03/31/2025 9:59:13 AM SSS265

HB1901
is a passport acceptance facility recognized by the United States Department
of State.


































03/31/2025 9:59:13 AM SSS265